Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2202
Renewable Fuel Infrastructure Program; created.

The Renewable Fuel Infrastructure Program is created. The purpose of the program is to improve retail motor fuel sites by installing, replacing, or converting ethanol infrastructure to be used to store, blend, or dispense renewable fuel. The program shall function as a grant program administered by the department. Grant applications shall be made on a form prescribed by the department. Grant funds shall be distributed to eligible persons for eligible ethanol infrastructure projects under the requirements in section 66-2203.

Laws 2019, LB585, § 2.